California statutes. Commercial Code
(d) A writing that is a security certificate is governed by this division and not by Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), even though it also meets the requirements of that division. However, a negotiable instrument governed by Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) is a financial asset if it is held in a securities account.

(e) An option or similar obligation issued by a clearing corporation to its participants is not a security, but is a financial asset.

(f) A commodity contract, as defined in paragraph (15) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102, is not a security or a financial asset.

(g) A document of title is not a financial asset unless subparagraph (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 8102 applies.

(h) A controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible is not a financial asset unless subparagraph (C) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 8102 applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 20.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

(a) A person acquires a security or an interest therein, under this division, if either of the following applies:

(1) The person is a purchaser to whom a security is delivered pursuant to Section 8301; or

(2) The person acquires a security entitlement to the security pursuant to Section 8501.

(b) A person acquires a financial asset, other than a security, or an interest therein, under this division, if the person acquires a security entitlement to the financial asset.

(c) A person who acquires a security entitlement to a security or other financial asset has the rights specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8501), but is a purchaser of any security, security entitlement, or other financial asset held by the securities intermediary only to the extent provided in Section 8503.

(d) Unless the context shows that a
 different meaning is intended, a person who is required by other law, regulation, rule, or agreement to transfer, deliver, present, surrender, exchange, or otherwise put in the possession of another person a security or financial asset satisfies that requirement by causing the other person to acquire an interest in the security or financial asset pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

(a) A person has notice of an adverse claim if any of the following applies:

(1) The person knows of the adverse claim.

(2) The person is aware of facts sufficient to indicate that there is a significant probability that the adverse claim exists and deliberately avoids information that would establish the existence of the adverse claim.

(3) The person has a duty, imposed by statute or regulation, to investigate whether an adverse claim exists, and the investigation so required would establish the existence of the adverse claim.

(b) Having knowledge that a financial asset or interest therein is or has been transferred by a representative imposes no duty of inquiry into the rightfulness of a transaction and is not notice of an adverse claim. However, a person who knows that a representative has transferred a financial asset or interest therein in a
 transaction that is, or whose proceeds are being used, for the individual benefit of the representative or otherwise in breach of duty has notice of an adverse claim.

(c) An act or event that creates a right to immediate performance of the principal obligation represented by a security certificate or sets a date on or after which the certificate is to be presented or surrendered for redemption or exchange does not itself constitute notice of an adverse claim except in the case of a transfer more than either of the following:

(1) One year after a date set for presentment or surrender for redemption or exchange.

(2) Six months after a date set for payment of money against presentation or surrender of the certificate, if money was available for payment on that date.

(d) A purchaser of a certificated security has notice of an adverse claim if the security certificate is any of the following:

(1) Whether in bearer or registered form, has been endorsed “for collection” or “for surrender” or for some other purpose not involving transfer.

(2) Is in bearer form and has on it an unambiguous statement that it is the property of a person other than the transferor, but the mere writing of a name on the certificate is not such a statement.

(e) Filing of a financing statement under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) is not notice of an adverse claim to a financial asset.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

(a) A purchaser has “control” of a certificated security in bearer form if the certificated security is delivered to the purchaser.

(b) A purchaser has “control” of a certificated security in registered form if the certificated security is delivered to the purchaser, and either of the following applies:

(1) The certificate is endorsed to the purchaser or in blank by an effective endorsement.

(2) The certificate is registered in the name of the purchaser, upon original issue or registration of transfer by the issuer.

(c) A purchaser has “control” of an uncertificated security if either of the following applies:

(1) The uncertificated security is delivered to the purchaser; or

(2) The issuer has agreed that it will comply with instructions originated by the purchaser without further consent by the registered owner.

(d) A purchaser has “control” of a security entitlement if any of the following apply:

(1) The purchaser becomes the entitlement holder.

(2) The securities intermediary has agreed that it will comply with entitlement orders originated by the
 purchaser without further consent by the entitlement holder.

(3) Another
 person, other than the transferor to the purchaser of an interest in the security entitlement, satisfies either of the following conditions:

(A) The person has control of the security entitlement and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the purchaser.

(B) The person obtains control of the security entitlement after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the security entitlement on behalf of the purchaser.

(e) If an interest in a security entitlement is granted by the entitlement holder to the entitlement holder’s own securities intermediary, the securities intermediary has control.

(f) A purchaser who has satisfied the
 requirements of subdivision (c) or (d) has control, even if the registered owner in the case of subdivision (c) or the entitlement holder in the case of subdivision (d) retains the right to make substitutions for the uncertificated security or security entitlement, to originate instructions or entitlement orders to the issuer or securities intermediary, or otherwise to deal with the uncertificated security or security entitlement.

(g) An issuer or a securities intermediary may not enter into an agreement of the kind described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) without the consent of the registered owner or entitlement holder, but an issuer or a securities intermediary is not required to enter into such an agreement even though the registered owner or entitlement holder so directs. An issuer or
 securities intermediary that has entered into such an agreement is not required to confirm the existence of the agreement to another party unless requested to do so by the registered owner or entitlement holder.

(h) A person that has control under this section is not required to acknowledge that it has control on behalf of a purchaser.

(i) If a person acknowledges that it has or will obtain control on behalf of a purchaser, unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this division or Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the purchaser and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 21.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8107.

(a) “Appropriate person” means any of the following:

(1) With respect to an endorsement, the person specified by a security certificate or by an effective special endorsement to be entitled to the security.

(2) With respect to an instruction, the registered owner of an uncertificated security.

(3) With respect to an entitlement order, the entitlement holder.

(4) If the person designated in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) is deceased, the designated person’s successor taking under other law or the designated person’s personal representative acting for the estate of the decedent, or the beneficiary of a security, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 5501 of the Probate Code, registered in beneficiary form, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5501 of the Probate Code, if the beneficiary has survived the death of the registered owner or all registered
 owners.

(5) If the person designated in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) lacks capacity, the designated person’s guardian, conservator, or other similar representative who has power under other law to transfer the security or financial asset.

(b) An endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order is effective if it is made by any of the following:

(1) It is made by the appropriate person.

(2) It is made by a person who has power under the law of agency to transfer the security or financial asset on behalf of the appropriate person, including, in the case of an instruction or entitlement order, a person who has control under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 8106.

(3) The appropriate person has ratified it or is otherwise precluded from asserting its ineffectiveness.

(c) An endorsement, instruction,
 or entitlement order made by a representative is effective even if:

(1) The representative has failed to comply with a controlling instrument or with the law of the state having jurisdiction of the representative relationship, including any law requiring the representative to obtain court approval of the transaction.

(2) The representative’s action in making the endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order or using the proceeds of the transaction is otherwise a breach of duty.

(d) If a security is registered in the name of or specially endorsed to a person described as a representative, or if a securities account is maintained in the name of a person described as a representative, an endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order made by the person is effective even though the person is no longer serving in the described capacity.

(e) Effectiveness of an endorsement, instruction, or
 entitlement order is determined as of the date the endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order is made, and an endorsement, instruction, or entitlement order does not become ineffective by reason of any later change of circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8108.

(a) A person who transfers a certificated security to a purchaser for value warrants to the purchaser, and an endorser, if the transfer is by endorsement, warrants to any subsequent purchaser, all of the following:

(1) The certificate is genuine and has not been materially altered.

(2) The transferor or endorser does not know of any fact that might impair the validity of the security.

(3) There is no adverse claim to the security.

(4) The transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer.

(5) If the transfer is by endorsement, the endorsement is made by an appropriate person, or if the endorsement is by an agent, the agent has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person.

(6) The transfer is otherwise effective and rightful.

(b) A person who originates
 an instruction for registration of transfer of an uncertificated security to a purchaser for value warrants to the purchaser all of the following:

(1) The instruction is made by an appropriate person, or if the instruction is by an agent, the agent has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person.

(2) The security is valid.

(3) There is no adverse claim to the security.

(4) At the time the instruction is presented to the issuer, all of the following will be applicable:

(A) The purchaser will be entitled to the registration of transfer.

(B) The transfer will be registered by the issuer free from all liens, security interests, restrictions, and claims other than those specified in the instruction.

(C) The transfer will not violate any restriction on transfer.

(D) The
 requested transfer will otherwise be effective and rightful.

(c) A person who transfers an uncertificated security to a purchaser for value and does not originate an instruction in connection with the transfer warrants all of the following:

(1) The uncertificated security is valid.

(2) There is no adverse claim to the security.

(3) The transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer.

(4) The transfer is otherwise effective and rightful.

(d) A person who endorses a security certificate warrants all of the following to the issuer:

(1) There is no adverse claim to the security.

(2) The endorsement is effective.

(e) A person who originates an instruction for registration of transfer of an uncertificated security warrants all of the following to the
 issuer:

(1) The instruction is effective.

(2) At the time the instruction is presented to the issuer the purchaser will be entitled to the registration of transfer.

(f) A person who presents a certificated security for registration of transfer or for payment or exchange warrants to the issuer that the person is entitled to the registration, payment, or exchange, but a purchaser for value and without notice of adverse claims to whom transfer is registered warrants only that the person has no knowledge of any unauthorized signature in a necessary endorsement.

(g) If a person acts as agent of another in delivering a certificated security to a purchaser, the identity of the principal was known to the person to whom the certificate was delivered, and the certificate delivered by the agent was received by the agent from the principal or received by the agent from another person at the direction of
 the principal, the person delivering the security certificate warrants only that the delivering person has authority to act for the principal and does not know of any adverse claim to the certificated security.

(h) A secured party who redelivers a security certificate received, or after payment and on order of the debtor delivers the security certificate to another person, makes only the warranties of an agent under subdivision (g).

(i) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a broker acting for a customer makes to the issuer and a purchaser the warranties provided in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive. A broker that delivers a security certificate to its customer, or causes its customer to be registered as the owner of an uncertificated security, makes to the customer the warranties provided in subdivision (a) or (b), and has the rights and privileges of a purchaser under this section. The warranties of and in favor of the broker acting as
 an agent are in addition to applicable warranties given by and in favor of the customer.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8109.

(a) A person who originates an entitlement order to a securities intermediary warrants all of the following to the securities intermediary:

(1) The entitlement order is made by an appropriate person, or if the entitlement order is by an agent, the agent has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person.

(2) There is no adverse claim to the security entitlement.

(b) A person who delivers a security certificate to a securities intermediary for credit to a securities account or originates an instruction with respect to an uncertificated security directing that the uncertificated security be credited to a securities account makes to the securities intermediary the warranties specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 8108.

(c) If a securities intermediary delivers a security certificate to its entitlement holder or causes its entitlement
 holder to be registered as the owner of an uncertificated security, the securities intermediary makes to the entitlement holder the warranties specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 8108.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8110.

(a) The local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction, as specified in subdivision (d), governs the following:

(1) The validity of a security.

(2) The rights and duties of the issuer with respect to registration of transfer.

(3) The effectiveness of registration of transfer by the issuer.

(4) Whether the issuer owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security.

(5) Whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a
 person to whom transfer of a certificated or uncertificated security is registered or a person who obtains control of an uncertificated security.

(b) The local law of the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction, as specified in subdivision (e), governs the following:

(1) Acquisition of a security entitlement from the securities intermediary.

(2) The rights and duties of the securities intermediary and entitlement holder arising out of a security entitlement.

(3) Whether the securities intermediary owes any duties to an adverse claimant to a security entitlement.

(4) Whether an adverse claim can
 be asserted against a person who acquires a security entitlement from the securities intermediary or a person who purchases a security entitlement or interest therein from an entitlement holder.

(c) The local law of the jurisdiction in which a security certificate is located at the time of delivery governs whether an adverse claim can be asserted against a person to whom the security certificate is delivered.

(d) “Issuer’s jurisdiction” means the jurisdiction under which the issuer of the security is organized or, if permitted by the law of that jurisdiction, the law of another jurisdiction specified by the issuer. An issuer organized under the law of this state may specify the law of another jurisdiction as the law governing the matters specified in paragraphs (2) to (5),
 inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(e) The following rules determine a “securities intermediary’s jurisdiction” for purposes of this section:

(1) If an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the security intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of this code, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction.

(2) If paragraph (1) does not apply and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary’s
 jurisdiction.

(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) applies and an agreement between the securities intermediary and its entitlement holder governing the securities account expressly provides that the securities account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction.

(4) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the entitlement holder’s account is located.

(5) If none of the preceding paragraphs applies, the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive
 office of the securities intermediary is located.

(f) A securities intermediary’s jurisdiction is not determined by the physical location of certificates representing financial assets, or by the jurisdiction in which is organized the issuer of the financial asset with respect to which an entitlement holder has a security entitlement, or by the location of facilities for data processing or other record keeping concerning the account.

(g) The local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction or the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction governs a matter or transaction specified in subdivision (a) or (b) even if the matter or transaction does not bear any relation to the jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 22.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8111.

A rule adopted by a clearing corporation governing rights and obligations among the clearing corporation and its participants in the clearing corporation is effective even if the rule conflicts with this division and affects another party who does not consent to the rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8112.

(a) The interest of a debtor in a certificated security may be reached by a creditor only by actual seizure of the security certificate by the officer making the attachment or levy, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d). However, a certificated security for which the certificate has been surrendered to the issuer may be reached by a creditor by legal process upon the issuer.

(b) The interest of a debtor in an uncertificated security may be reached by a creditor only by legal process upon the issuer at its chief executive office in the United States, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d).

(c) The interest of a debtor in a security entitlement may be reached by a creditor only by legal process upon the securities intermediary with whom the debtor’s securities account is maintained, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d).

(d) The interest of a debtor in a
 certificated security for which the certificate is in the possession of a secured party, or in an uncertificated security registered in the name of a secured party, or a security entitlement maintained in the name of a secured party, may be reached by a creditor by legal process upon the secured party.

(e) A creditor whose debtor is the owner of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement is entitled to aid from a court of competent jurisdiction, by injunction or otherwise, in reaching the certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement or in satisfying the claim by means allowed at law or in equity in regard to property that cannot readily be reached by other legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8113.

A contract or modification of a contract for the sale or purchase of a security is enforceable whether or not there is a writing signed or record authenticated by a party against whom enforcement is sought, even if the contract or modification is not capable of performance within one year of its making.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8114.

The following rules apply in an action on a certificated security against the issuer:

(a) Unless specifically denied in the pleadings, each signature on a security certificate or in a necessary endorsement is admitted.

(b) If the effectiveness of a signature is put in issue, the burden of establishing effectiveness is on the party claiming under the signature, but the signature is presumed to be genuine or authorized.

(c) If signatures on a security certificate are admitted or established, production of the certificate entitles a holder to recover on it unless the defendant establishes a defense or a defect going to the validity of the security.

(d) If it is shown that a defense or defect exists, the plaintiff has the burden of establishing that the plaintiff or some person under whom the plaintiff claims is a person against whom the defense or defect cannot be asserted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8115.

A securities intermediary that has transferred a financial asset pursuant to an effective entitlement order, or a broker or other agent or bailee that has dealt with a financial asset at the direction of its customer or principal, is not liable to a person having an adverse claim to the financial asset, unless the securities intermediary, or broker or other agent or bailee did one or more of the following:

(1) Took the action after it had been served with an injunction, restraining order, or other legal process enjoining it from doing so, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, and had a reasonable opportunity to act on the injunction, restraining order, or other legal process.

(2) Acted in collusion with the wrongdoer in violating the rights of the adverse claimant.

(3) In the case of a security certificate that has been stolen, acted with notice of the adverse claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8116.

A securities intermediary that receives a financial asset and establishes a security entitlement to the financial asset in favor of an entitlement holder is a purchaser for value of the financial asset. A securities intermediary that acquires a security entitlement to a financial asset from another securities intermediary acquires the security entitlement for value if the securities intermediary acquiring the security entitlement establishes a security entitlement to the financial asset in favor of an entitlement holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Issue and Issuer [8201. - 8210.]

8201.

(a) With respect to an obligation on or a defense to a security, an “issuer” includes a person that does any of the following:

(1) Places or authorizes the placing of its name on a security certificate, other than as authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or the like, to evidence a share, participation, or other interest in its property or in an enterprise, or to evidence its duty to perform an obligation represented by the certificate.

(2) Creates a share, participation, or other interest in its property or in an enterprise, or undertakes an obligation, that is an uncertificated security.

(3) Directly or indirectly creates a fractional interest in its rights or property, if the fractional interest is represented by a security certificate.

(4) Becomes responsible for, or in place of, another person described as an issuer in this section.

(b) With respect to an obligation on or defense to a security, a guarantor is an issuer to the extent of its guaranty, whether or not its obligation is noted on a security certificate.

(c) With respect to a registration of a transfer, issuer means a person on whose behalf transfer books are maintained.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8202.

(a) Even against a purchaser for value and without notice, the terms of a certificated security include terms stated on the certificate and terms made part of the security by reference on the certificate to another instrument, indenture, or document or to a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, or the like, to the extent the terms referred to do not conflict with terms stated on the certificate. A reference under this subdivision does not of itself charge a purchaser for value with notice of a defect going to the validity of the security, even if the certificate expressly states that a person accepting it admits notice. The terms of an uncertificated security include those stated in any instrument, indenture, or document or in a constitution, statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, order, or the like, pursuant to which the security is issued.

(b) The following rules apply if an issuer asserts that a security is not
 valid:

(1) A security other than one issued by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, even though issued with a defect going to its validity, is valid in the hands of a purchaser for value and without notice of the particular defect unless the defect involves a violation of a constitutional provision. In that case, the security is valid in the hands of a purchaser for value and without notice of the defect, other than one who takes by original issue.

(2) Paragraph (1) applies to an issuer that is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality only if there has been substantial compliance with the legal requirements governing the issue or the issuer has received a substantial consideration for the issue as a whole or for the particular security and a stated purpose of the issue is one for which the issuer has power to borrow money or issue the security.

(c) Except as
 otherwise provided in Section 8205, lack of genuineness of a certificated security is a complete defense, even against a purchaser for value and without notice.

(d) All other defenses of the issuer of a security, including nondelivery and conditional delivery of a certificated security, are ineffective against a purchaser for value who has taken the certificated security without notice of the particular defense.

(e) This section does not affect the right of a party to cancel a contract for a security “when, as and if issued” or “when distributed” in the event of a material change in the character of the security that is the subject of the contract or in the plan or arrangement pursuant to which the security is to be issued or distributed.

(f) If a security is held by a securities intermediary against whom an entitlement holder has a security entitlement with respect to the security, the issuer may not assert any defense
 that the issuer could not assert if the entitlement holder held the security directly.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8203.

After an act or event, other than a call that has been revoked, creating a right to immediate performance of the principal obligation represented by a certificated security or setting a date on or after which the security is to be presented or surrendered for redemption or exchange, a purchaser is charged with notice of any defect in its issue or defense of the issuer, if the act or event either:

(1) Requires the payment of money, the delivery of a certificated security, the registration of transfer of an uncertificated security, or any of them on presentation or surrender of the security certificate, the money or security is available on the date set for payment or exchange, and the purchaser takes the security more than one year after that date.

(2) Is not covered by paragraph (1) and the purchaser takes the security more than two years after the date set for surrender or presentation or the date on which performance became due.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8204.

A restriction on transfer of a security imposed by the issuer, even if otherwise lawful, is ineffective against a person without knowledge of the restriction unless either of the following applies:

(1) The security is certificated and the restriction is noted conspicuously on the security certificate.

(2) The security is uncertificated and the registered owner has been notified of the restriction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8205.

An unauthorized signature placed on a security certificate before or in the course of issue is ineffective, but the signature is effective in favor of a purchaser for value of the certificated security if the purchaser is without notice of the lack of authority and the signing has been done by one of the following:

(1) An authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or other person entrusted by the issuer with the signing of the security certificate or of similar security certificates, or the immediate preparation for signing of any of them.

(2) An employee of the issuer, or of any of the persons listed in paragraph (1), entrusted with responsible handling of the security certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8206.

(a) If a security certificate contains the signatures necessary to its issue or transfer but is incomplete in any other respect, the following apply:

(1) Any person may complete it by filling in the blanks as authorized.

(2) Even if the blanks are incorrectly filled in, the security certificate as completed is enforceable by a purchaser who took it for value and without notice of the incorrectness.

(b) A complete security certificate that has been improperly altered, even if fraudulently, remains enforceable, but only according to its original terms.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8207.

(a) Before due presentment for registration of transfer of a certificated security in registered form or of an instruction requesting registration of transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer or indenture trustee may treat the registered owner as the person exclusively entitled to vote, receive notifications, and otherwise exercise all the rights and powers of an owner.

(b) This division does not affect the liability of the registered owner of a security for a call, assessment, or the like.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8208.

(a) A person signing a security certificate as authenticating trustee, registrar, transfer agent, or the like, warrants all of the following to a purchaser for value of the certificated security, if the purchaser is without notice of a particular defect:

(1) The certificate is genuine.

(2) The person’s own participation in the issue of the security is within the person’s capacity and within the scope of the authority received by the person from the issuer.

(3) The person has reasonable grounds to believe that the certificated security is in the form and within the amount the issuer is authorized to issue.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed, a person signing under subdivision (a) does not assume responsibility for the validity of the security in other respects.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8209.

A lien in favor of an issuer upon a certificated security is valid against a purchaser only if the right of the issuer to the lien is noted conspicuously on the security certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8210.

(a) In this section, “overissue” means the issue of securities in excess of the amount the issuer has corporate power to issue, but an overissue does not occur if appropriate action has cured the overissue.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the provisions of this division that validate a security or compel its issue or reissue do not apply to the extent that validation, issue, or reissue would result in overissue.

(c) If an identical security not constituting an overissue is reasonably available for purchase, a person entitled to issue or validation may compel the issuer to purchase the security and deliver it if certificated or register its transfer if uncertificated, against surrender of any security certificate the person holds.

(d) If a security is not reasonably available for purchase, a person entitled to issue or validation may recover from the
 issuer the price the person or the last purchaser for value paid for it with interest from the date of the person’s demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 497, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Transfer of Certificated and Uncertificated Securities [8301. - 8307.]

8301.

(a) Delivery of a certificated security to a purchaser occurs when any of the following occur:

(1) The purchaser acquires possession of the security certificate.

(2) Another person, other than a securities intermediary, either acquires possession of the security certificate on behalf of the purchaser or, having previously acquired possession of the certificate, acknowledges that it holds for the purchaser.

(3) A securities intermediary acting on behalf of the purchaser acquires possession of the security certificate, only if the certificate is in registered form and is (A) registered in the name of the purchaser, (B) payable to the order of the purchaser, or (C) specially endorsed to the purchaser by an effective endorsement and has not been endorsed to the securities intermediary or in blank.

(b) Delivery of an uncertificated security to a purchaser
 occurs when any of the following occur:

(1) The issuer registers the purchaser as the registered owner, upon original issue or registration of transfer.

(2) Another person, other than a securities intermediary, either becomes the registered owner of the uncertificated security on behalf of the purchaser or, having previously become the registered owner, acknowledges that it holds for the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 33.3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a purchaser of a certificated or uncertificated security acquires all rights in the security that the transferor had or had power to transfer.

(b) A purchaser of a limited interest acquires rights only to the extent of the interest purchased.

(c) A purchaser of a certificated security who as a previous holder had notice of an adverse claim does not improve its position by taking from a protected purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 33.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

(a) “Protected purchaser” means a purchaser of a certificated or uncertificated security, or of an interest therein, who does all of the following:

(1) Gives value.

(2) Does not have notice of any adverse claim to the security.

(3) Obtains control of the certificated or uncertificated security.

(b) A protected purchaser also acquires its interest in the security free of any adverse claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 23.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.
